Utah statutes.
53A-11-1207.   Faculty oversight of authorized clubs.
(1)  A school shall approve the faculty sponsor, supervisor, or monitor for
each authorized curricular, noncurricular, and religious club to provide
oversight consistent with this part and the needs of the school to ensure that
the methods of expression, religious practices, or other conduct of the
students or advisors involved do not:
(a)  unreasonably interfere with the ability of school officials to maintain
order and discipline;
(b)  unreasonably endanger or threaten the well-being of persons or property;
(c)  violate concepts of civility or propriety appropriate to a school
setting; or
(d)  violate applicable laws, rules, regulations, and policies.
(2) (a)  A school shall annually approve faculty members as sponsors of
curricular clubs.
(b)  Faculty sponsors shall organize and direct the purpose and activities of
a curricular club.
(3) (a)  A school shall approve faculty members to serve as supervisors for
authorized noncurricular clubs.
(b)  A faculty supervisor shall provide oversight to ensure compliance with
the approved club purposes, goals, and activities and with the provisions of
this part and other applicable laws, rules, and policies.
(c)  The approval of a faculty supervisor or monitor does not constitute
school sponsorship of the club.
(d)  A faculty monitor approved for a religious club may not participate in
the activities of the religious club, except to perform the supervisory role
required by this section.
(4)  Without the prior approval by the school, a person who is not a school
faculty member or a club member may not:
(a)  make a presentation to a noncurricular club; or
(b)  direct, conduct, control, or regularly attend the meetings of a
noncurricular club.
